data/hungarian.aff
SFX I   ök   einkéiül     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ESS]
SFX I   ök   einkéiért    ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX I   ök   einkéivé     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TRANS]
SFX I   ök   einkéivel    ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INSTR]
SFX I   ök   einkéitől    ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ABL]
SFX I   ök   einkéit      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ACC]
SFX I   ök   einkéiről    ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DEL]
SFX I   ök   einkéire     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SBL]
SFX I   ök   einkéinél    ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ADE]
SFX I   ök   einkéinek    ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DAT]
SFX I   ök   einkéin      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SUE]
SFX I   ök   einkéiig     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TERM]
SFX I   ök   einkéihez    ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ALL]
SFX I   ök   einkéig      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[TERM]
SFX I   ök   einkéiből    ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ELA]
SFX I   ök   einkéiben    ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INE]
SFX I   ök   einkéibe     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ILL]
SFX I   ök   einkéi       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[NOM]
SFX I   ök   einkéhez     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ALL]
SFX I   ök   einkéből     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ELA]
SFX I   ök   einkében     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[INE]
SFX I   ök   einkébe      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ILL]
SFX I   ök   einké        ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[NOM]
SFX I   ök   einktől      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[ABL]
SFX I   ök   einkről      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[DEL]
SFX I   ök   einkre       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[SBL]
SFX I   ök   einknél      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[ADE]
SFX I   ök   einknek      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[DAT]
SFX I   ök   einkként     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[FORM]
SFX I   ök   einkké       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[TRANS]
SFX I   ök   einkkor      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[TEMP]
SFX I   ök   einkkel      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[INSTR]
SFX I   ök   einkig       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[TERM]
SFX I   ök   einkhez      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[ALL]
SFX I   ök   einket       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[ACC]
SFX I   ök   einken       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[SUE]
SFX I   ök   einkből      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[ELA]
SFX I   ök   einkben      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[INE]
SFX I   ök   einkbe       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[ILL]
SFX I   ök   eink         ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[NOM]
SFX I   ök   einek        ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[DAT]
SFX I   ök   ein          ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[SUE]
SFX I   ök   eimül        ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[ESS]
SFX I   ök   eiméül       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ESS]
SFX I   ök   eiméért      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX I   ök   eimévé       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[TRANS]
SFX I   ök   eimével      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[INSTR]
SFX I   ök   eimétől      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ABL]
SFX I   ök   eimét        ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ACC]
SFX I   ök   eiméről      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[DEL]
SFX I   ök   eimért       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX I   ök   eimére       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[SBL]
SFX I   ök   eiménél      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ADE]
SFX I   ök   eimének      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[DAT]
SFX I   ök   eimén        ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[SUE]
SFX I   ök   eiméiül      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ESS]
SFX I   ök   eiméiért     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX I   ök   eiméivé      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TRANS]
SFX I   ök   eiméivel     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INSTR]
SFX I   ök   eiméitől     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ABL]
SFX I   ök   eiméit       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ACC]
SFX I   ök   eiméiről     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DEL]
SFX I   ök   eiméire      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SBL]
SFX I   ök   eiméinél     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ADE]
SFX I   ök   eiméinek     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DAT]
SFX I   ök   eiméin       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SUE]
SFX I   ök   eiméiig      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TERM]
SFX I   ök   eiméihez     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ALL]
SFX I   ök   eiméig       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[TERM]
SFX I   ök   eiméiből     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ELA]
SFX I   ök   eiméiben     ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INE]
SFX I   ök   eiméibe      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ILL]
SFX I   ök   eiméi        ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[NOM]
SFX I   ök   eiméhez      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ALL]
SFX I   ök   eiméből      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ELA]
SFX I   ök   eimében      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[INE]
SFX I   ök   eimébe       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ILL]
SFX I   ök   eimé         ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[NOM]
SFX I   ök   eimtől       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[ABL]
SFX I   ök   eimről       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[DEL]
SFX I   ök   eimre        ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[SBL]
SFX I   ök   eimnél       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[ADE]
SFX I   ök   eimnek       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[DAT]
SFX I   ök   eimmé        ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[TRANS]
SFX I   ök   eimmel       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[INSTR]
SFX I   ök   eimként      ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[FORM]
SFX I   ök   eimkor       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[TEMP]
SFX I   ök   eimig        ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[TERM]
SFX I   ök   eimhez       ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[ALL]
SFX I   ök   eimet        ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[ACC]
SFX I   ök   eimen        ök                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_1]+[SUE]
