data/hungarian.dic
víziborjak/Inx	víziborjú[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
tetvek/Inxş	tetű[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
nyolcvanhétezrek/Ib	nyolcvanhétezer[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
negyvenkettőezrek/Ib	negyvenkettőezer[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kilencvenötezrek/Ib	kilencvenötezer[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kevesek/n×ÓI	kevés[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
huszonkétezrek/Ib	huszonkétezer[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
hetvenháromezrek/Ib	hetvenháromezer[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
hatvanhetek/Ibh	hatvanhét[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
harminchetek/Ibh	harminchét[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
üzletágak/IóÍžĆćşx	üzletág[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
űrtartalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x	űrtartalom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
öröknaptárak/IóÍžĆćşx	öröknaptár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
öblök/IóÍžJĆćş´x	öböl[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
írósvajak/IóÍžĆćşx	írósvaj[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
éléstárak/IóÍžĆćşx	éléstár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
árvizek/IóÍžĆćşx	árvíz[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
álnevek/IóÍžĆćşx	álnév[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
záróizmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	záróizom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
vízikerekek/IóÍžĆćşx	vízikerék[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
vándorutak/IóÍžĆćşx	vándorút[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
vádak/IóÍžĆćşx	vád[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
visszautak/IóÍžĆćşx	visszaút[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
vermek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	verem[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
utak/IóÍžĆćşx	út[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
távcsőtükrök/IóÍžJĆćş´x	távcsőtükör[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
tisztítótüzek/IóÍžĆćşx	tisztítótűz[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
teleholdak/IóÍžĆćşx	telehold[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
sósrudak/IóÍžĆćşx	sósrúd[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
színműirodalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x	színműirodalom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
szájak/IóÍžĆćşx	száj[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
szerelmeslevelek/IóÍžĆćşx	szerelmeslevél[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
szedrek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	szeder[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
spanyolfalak/IóÍžĆćşx	spanyolfal[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
sarjak/IóÍžĆćşx	sarj[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
rokonfogalmak/wIóÍžJĆćş´x	rokonfogalom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
pótágyak/IóÍžĆćşx	pótágy[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
poklok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	pokol[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
parafatalpak/wIóÍžĆćşx	parafatalp[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
oklevelek/IóÍžĆćşx	oklevél[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
nyersolajak/IóÍžĆćşx	nyersolaj[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
nagyfejedelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	nagyfejedelem[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
márványszobrok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	márványszobor[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
meszek/IóÍžĆćşx	mész[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
magántitkok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	magántitok[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
légzőgyökerek/IóÍžĆćşx	légzőgyökér[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
levesmerőkanalak/wIóÍžĆćşx	levesmerőkanál[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
külterek/IóÍžĆćşx	kültér[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
könyvtárak/IóÍžĆćşx	könyvtár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kérgek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	kéreg[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kukoricahéjak/IóÍžĆćşx	kukoricahéj[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kisvizek/IóÍžĆćşx	kisvíz[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
keserűgyökerek/IóÍžĆćşx	keserűgyökér[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kazánházak/IóÍžĆćşx	kazánház[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kakaslábfüvek/IóÍžĆćşx	kakaslábfű[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
izgalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x	izgalom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
húslevek/IóÍžĆćşx	húslé[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
hullámvasutak/IóÍžĆćşx	hullámvasút[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
hernyóselymek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	hernyóselyem[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
hamvvedrek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	hamvveder[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
görvélyfüvek/IóÍžĆćşx	görvélyfű[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
győzelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	győzelem[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
gubacsdarazsak/IóÍžĆćşx	gubacsdarázs[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
födelek/IóÍžĆćşx	födél[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
futótüzek/IóÍžĆćşx	futótűz[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
finomolajak/IóÍžĆćşx	finomolaj[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
fehérgyökerek/IóÍžĆćşx	fehérgyökér[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
ernyővázak/IóÍžĆćşx	ernyőváz[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
egységárak/IóÍžĆćşx	egységár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
diliházak/IóÍžĆćşx	diliház[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
csónakházak/IóÍžĆćşx	csónakház[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
csapfogak/IóÍžĆćşx	csapfog[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
búcsúpoharak/IóÍžĆćşx	búcsúpohár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
borospoharak/IóÍžĆćşx	borospohár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
belvizek/IóÍžĆćşx	belvíz[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
bajuszfüvek/IóÍžĆćşx	bajuszfű[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
aljak/IóÍžĆćşx	alj[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
Szeghalmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	Szeghalom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
hetek/Ia	hét[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
